Utah statutes.
78B-3-906.   Post-trial motions -- Appeals.

(1)  A party may move for a new trial or appeal a judgment only on the following grounds:

(a)  judicial misconduct that materially affected the substantive rights of a party;

(b)  misconduct of the jury;

(c)  corruption, fraud, or other undue means employed in the proceedings of the court, jury, or adverse party that prevented a party from having a fair trial; or

(d)  to correct errors of law.

(2)  Parties may file post-trial motions:

(a)  relating to costs and attorney fees;

(b)  to correct a clerical error in a judgment; and

(c)  to enforce a judgment.



Enacted by Chapter 111, 2011 General Session

